Florida, session 2026, SB528.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 67 68 Section 1.âParagraph (m) is added to subsection (4) of 69 section 20.60, Florida Statutes, to read: 70 20.60âDepartment of Commerce; creation; powers and duties.â 71 (4)âThe purpose of the department is to assist the Governor 72 in working with the Legislature, state agencies, business 73 leaders, and economic development professionals to formulate and 74 implement coherent and consistent policies and strategies 75 designed to promote economic opportunities for all Floridians. 76 The department is the stateâs chief agency for business 77 recruitment and expansion and economic development. To 78 accomplish such purposes, the department shall: 79 (m)âEncourage and oversee manufacturing in this state in 80 coordination with the Chief Manufacturing Officer. 81 Section 2.âSection 20.602, Florida Statutes, is created to 82 read: 83 20.602âChief Manufacturing Officer.â 84 (1)âThere is designated among the senior leadership of the 85 Department of Commerce a Chief Manufacturing Officer for the 86 purpose of supporting the manufacturing ecosystem statewide. The 87 Chief Manufacturing Officer is appointed by and serves at the 88 pleasure of the Secretary of Commerce. 89 (2)âThe Chief Manufacturing Officer shall do all of the 90 following: 91 (a)âServe as a subject-matter expert for the state on 92 issues related to manufacturing. 93 (b)âPromote and coordinate manufacturing efforts in this 94 state and identify gaps across state-supported activities. 95 (c)âProvide strategic direction for interagency and cross 96 disciplinary initiatives to promote and support manufacturing in 97 this state. 98 (d)âWork with federal, state, regional, and local 99 governmental entities and nongovernmental entities to align 100 manufacturing priorities. 101 (e)âEngage with state agencies and water management 102 districts to create processes, programs, decision frameworks, 103 and reporting mechanisms intended to support manufacturing in 104 this state. 105 (f)âCollaborate with the Department of Education, school 106 districts, charter schools, technical colleges, state colleges, 107 and regional workforce development boards to promote 108 manufacturing as a career path. Such collaboration must include 109 all of the following: 110 1.âSupporting curriculum development and career awareness 111 initiatives in elementary and middle schools, including 112 classroom resources, career fairs, and outreach activities 113 designed to inspire interest in manufacturing. 114 2.âEstablishing technology demonstration centers, work 115 based learning opportunities, and exposure to manufacturing 116 careers through partnerships with guidance counselors and 117 recognized career exploration programs, including Project Lead 118 The Way. 119 3.âPreserving and expanding manufacturing programs in high 120 schools, promoting dual enrollment and industry certifications, 121 and ensuring that course selection and grade point average 122 weighting policies encourage students to pursue, rather than 123 discourage them from pursuing, manufacturing tracks. 124 4.âFunding and supporting regional manufacturing training 125 centers to provide multiple entry points for careers in 126 manufacturing, including awareness initiatives for 127 underrepresented populations and individuals reentering the 128 workforce. 129 5.âReenergizing the marketing and promotion of 130 manufacturing careers in coordination with the Florida 131 Manufacturing Promotional Campaign created in s. 288.1031, using 132 messaging tailored to the interests and language of todayâs 133 youth. 134 (3)âAll state and local governmental entities shall assist 135 the Chief Manufacturing Officer to the extent such assistance is 136 consistent with law and with budgetary constraints. 137 (4)âThe department shall prepare a report, in consultation 138 with the Chief Manufacturing Officer and the National Institute 139 of Standards and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership 140 organization in this state, regarding manufacturing efforts in 141 this state. The department shall submit the report to the 142 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 143 House of Representatives by December 15, 2027, and every 2 years 144 thereafter. The report must include information regarding the 145 strength and economic importance of the manufacturing industry 146 in this state. 147 Section 3.âSection 288.103, Florida Statutes, is created to 148 read: 149 288.103âFlorida Manufacturersâ Workforce Development Grant 150 Program.â 151 (1)âThe Florida Manufacturersâ Workforce Development Grant 152 Program is created within the Department of Commerce, under the 153 direction of the Chief Manufacturing Officer in consultation 154 with the National Institute of Standards and Technology 155 Manufacturing Extension Partnership organization in this state, 156 to fund proposed projects, subject to appropriation by the 157 Legislature, which support small manufacturers in this state 158 with the deployment of new technologies or cybersecurity 159 infrastructure and to strengthen the manufacturing workforce 160 pipeline from elementary education through postsecondary 161 training and workforce reentry. 162 (2)âThe department, in coordination with the Chief 163 Manufacturing Officer and the National Institute of Standards 164 and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership organization 165 in this state, shall review submitted applications and select 166 projects for awards which create strategic investments in 167 workforce training and education partnerships to facilitate the 168 deployment of new technologies or cybersecurity infrastructure 169 and to expand career awareness and preparation for manufacturing 170 occupations across the K-12, postsecondary, and workforce 171 training systems. Final grant awards are made at the sole 172 discretion of the department. 173 (3)âThe department, in coordination with the Chief 174 Manufacturing Officer and the National Institute of Standards 175 and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership organization 176 in this state, shall establish and publish ranking metrics for 177 reviewing grants and awarding them to applicants on a 178 competitive basis. Metrics may include the number of employees, 179 matching funds pledged by the applicant, and expected benefits 180 from the grant award. Priority must be given to projects with 181 innovative plans, advanced technologies, and development 182 strategies that focus on workforce development for small 183 manufacturers across this state and that include one or more of 184 the following: 185 (a)âEstablishment or expansion of regional manufacturing 186 training centers. 187 (b)âPartnerships with the Department of Education, school 188 districts, charter schools, technical colleges, and state 189 colleges to support manufacturing curricula, dual enrollment, 190 and industry certification programs. 191 (c)âDevelopment of elementary and middle school career 192 awareness programs, including technology demonstration centers 193 and guidance counselor resources. 194 (d)âOutreach and training programs targeting 195 underrepresented populations, including reentry populations. 196 (e)âMarketing and promotion of manufacturing careers 197 consistent with s. 288.1031. 198 (4)âApplicants may seek funding for workforce development 199 and operations; however, grant funding awarded under this 200 section may not be used to pay salary and benefits or general 201 business or office expenses. Grants awarded under the program 202 shall be administered by the department from the Economic 203 Development Trust Fund established in s. 288.095. 204 (5)âThe department shall annually provide a list to the 205 public of each project awarded a grant, the benefit of each 206 project in meeting the goals and objectives of the program, and 207 the current status of each project. The department shall include 208 such information in the annual incentives report required under 209 s. 288.0065. 210 (6)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 211 section. 212 Section 4.âSection 288.1031, Florida Statutes, is created 213 to read: 214 288.1031âFlorida Manufacturing Promotional Campaign.â 215 (1)âThe Legislature finds that there is a need for a 216 campaign to increase consumer awareness of manufacturing 217 activities in this state, to expand market exposure for 218 manufactured products and goods in this state, and to inspire 219 future generations of entrepreneurs, fabricators, and skilled 220 workers to build and grow domestic businesses and manufacturing 221 operations in this state. The Legislature further finds that a 222 campaign that creates a partnership between the state and 223 manufacturers in this state is necessary to promote and 224 advertise manufactured products efficiently. 225 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 226 (a)ââManufactured productâ means any tangible personal 227 property or consumer good, whether a durable or nondurable good, 228 that has been processed, fabricated, or produced, often through 229 industrial or mechanical processes. The term includes items sold 230 or leased to consumers. 231 (b)ââPersonâ means an individual, a firm, a partnership, a 232 corporation, an association, a business, a trust, a legal 233 representative, or any other business unit. 234 (3)âThe Florida Manufacturing Promotional Campaign is 235 created within the department. The Chief Manufacturing Officer 236 shall administer the campaign in coordination with the National 237 Institute of Standards and Technology Manufacturing Extension 238 Partnership organization in this state. The purpose of the 239 campaign is to serve as a voluntary marketing program to promote 240 manufacturing products and businesses in this state. 241 (4)âThe department shall do all of the following: 242 (a)âDevelop logos for the campaign and authorize the use of 243 such logos by rule. 244 (b)âCreate promotional materials for the campaign. 245 (c)âRegister campaign participants. 246 (d)âDevelop in-kind advertising programs. 247 (e)âContract with media representatives for the purpose of 248 dispersing promotional materials. 249 (5)âA person who produces manufactured products may 250 participate in the campaign only by registering annually with 251 the department. The department shall establish by rule the form 252 and manner of registration. 253 (6)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement and 254 administer the campaign. By rule, the department shall establish 255 the logos or product identifiers to be depicted for use in the 256 campaign for advertising, publicizing, and promoting the sale of 257 manufactured products in this state. The department shall also 258 adopt rules necessary to ensure compliance with the campaign and 259 to govern participant registration. 260 (7)âThe department shall annually create a report on the 261 success of the campaign, including detailed performance measures 262 and outcomes, sources of in-kind advertising, contracts related 263 to disbursement of promotional materials, the names of persons 264 participating in the campaign, and other information for the 265 campaign. The department shall submit the report as part of the 266 annual report required in s. 20.602(4). 267 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.